Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-313
License; application; provisional license.

(1) A person may apply for a license as an alcohol and drug counselor if he or she meets the requirements provided in section 38-316.

(2) A person may apply for a license as a provisional alcohol and drug counselor which permits such person to practice and acquire the supervised clinical work experience required for licensure as an alcohol and drug counselor. Provisional status may be granted once and held for a time period not to exceed six years, except that if an individual does not complete the supervised clinical work experience required for licensure within the specified six-year period due to unforeseen circumstances as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board, the individual may apply for one additional provisional license. An individual who is so licensed shall not render services without clinical supervision. An individual who holds provisional licensure shall inform all clients that he or she holds a provisional certification and is practicing under supervision and shall identify the supervisor. An applicant shall meet the requirements provided in section 38-314.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 118;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,354;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 164.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.